Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2046.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 43-117 of Title 11, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section, “unauthorized camp” means any tent,
shelter, or bedding constructed or arranged for the purpose of or in
such a way to permit overnight use on a property not designated as a
campsite.
B. 1. Any campsite on land within a municipality not
designated for use as a campsite shall be subject to evaluation by
the Department of Environmental Quality and the Department of Public
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2046 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Safe ty if the Department of Environmental Quality receives three
credible reports that such land is being utilized as an unauthorized
camp. Such evaluation shall be based on basic environmental and
sanitation standards.
2. If such evaluation finds that such campsite does not meet
basic environmental and sanitation standards, the Department of
Environmental Quality and the Department of Public Safety shall
jointly notify the municipality where such campsite is located of
such evaluation. The municipality shall remove such unauthorized
camp within ninety (90) days of such notification. If the
municipality does not remove such camp within such period, the
Department of Public Safety shall remove such camp within sixty (60)
days.
C. The Department of Environmental Quality and the Department
of Public Safety shall promulgate rules to effectuate the provisions
of this section.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 339.10 of Title 19, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section, “unauthorized camp” means any tent,
shelter, or bedding constructed or arranged for the purpose of or in
such a way to permit overnight use on a property not designated as a
campsite.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2046 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

B. 1. Any campsite on land within a county not designated for
use as a campsite shall be subject to evaluation by the Department
of Environmental Quality and the Department of Public Safety if the
Department of Environmental Quality receives three credible reports
that such land is being utilized as an unauthorized camp. Such
evaluation shall be based on basic environmental and sanitation
standards.
2. If such evaluation finds that such campsite does not meet
basic environmental and sanitation standards, the Department of
Environmental Quality and the Department of Public Safety shall
jointly notify the county where such campsite is located of such
evaluation. The county shall remove such unauthorized camp within
ninety (90) days of such notification. If the county does not
remove such camp within such period, the Department of Public Safety
shall remove such camp within sixty (60) days.
C. The Department of Environmental Quality and the Department
of Public Safety shall promulgate rules to effectuate the provisions
of this section.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON LOCAL AND COUNTY GOVERNMENT
February 10, 2026 - DO PASS AS AMENDED BY CS




SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2046 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)